Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB534.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 27A.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall send certified notices of conviction of
a felony to the State Board of Elections within ten (10) days after the conviction
becomes final[, including the exhaustion of all appeals,] with regard to any person
before the courts of the Commonwealth.
(2) By July 24, 2026, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall send to the State
Board of Elections an all-time list of persons convicted of a felony, including any
persons convicted of a felony whose case is currently pending appeal, who are
currently ineligible to vote. The State Board of Elections shall cause the removal
of the name of any person identified through the list as ineligible to vote from the
voter registration records it maintains by August 4, 2026.
Section 2. KRS 83A.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A mayor shall be elected by the voters of each city at a regular election. A
candidate for mayor shall be a resident of the city for not less than one (1) year
prior to his or her election. His or her term of office shall begin on the first day of
January following his or her election and shall be for four (4) years and until his or
her successor qualifies. If a person is elected or appointed as mayor in response to a
vacancy and serves less than four (4) calendar years, then that period of service
shall not be considered for purposes of re-election a term of office. A mayor shall
be at least twenty-one (21) years of age, shall be a qualified voter in the city, and
shall reside in the city throughout his or her term of office.
(2) If a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor, the following provisions shall apply:
(a) The legislative body of the city shall fill the vacancy within thirty (30) days;
(b) A member of the legislative body in any city organized and governed under
the commission plan as provided by KRS 83A.140 or city manager plan as
Page 1 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
provided by KRS 83A.150 may vote for himself;
(c) A member of the legislative body in any city organized and governed under
the mayor-council plan as provided by KRS 83A.130 and in any city of the
first class organized under the mayor-alderman plan as provided by KRS
Chapter 83 shall not vote for himself; and
(d) The legislative body shall elect from among its members an individual to
preside over meetings of the legislative body during any vacancy in the office
of mayor in accordance with the provisions of KRS 83A.130 to 83A.150.
(3) When voting to fill the vacancy created by a resignation of a mayor the resigning
mayor shall not vote on his or her successor.
(4) Each legislative body member shall be elected at large by the voters of each city at
a regular election. A candidate for a legislative body shall be a resident of the city
for not less than one (1) year prior to his or her election. His or her term of office
shall begin on the first day of January following his or her election and shall be for
two (2) years, except as provided by KRS 83A.050. A member shall be at least
eighteen (18) years of age, shall be a qualified voter in the city, and shall reside in
the city throughout his or her term of office.
(5) (a) If one (1) or more vacancies on a legislative body occur in a way that one (1)
or more members remain seated, the remaining members shall within thirty
(30) days fill the vacancies one (1) at a time, giving each new appointee
reasonable notice of his or her selection as will enable him or her to meet and
act with the remaining members in making further appointments until all
vacancies are filled.
(b) If a majority of the membership on a legislative body is vacated as a result
of a judgment by a Circuit Court or on appeal under subsection (4) of
Section 12 of this Act because of an election error due to no fault of any
candidate or fraud, a new special election shall be called and held as soon
Page 2 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
as practicable for the bona fide candidates only. Members of the legislative
body whose term expires shall remain in office until the contest and any
appeals of the regular election are complete and final.
(c) If vacancies occur in a way that all seats become vacant, the Governor shall
appoint qualified persons to fill the vacancies sufficient to constitute a
quorum. Remaining vacancies shall be filled as provided in this section.
(6) If for any reason, any vacancy in the office of mayor or the legislative body is not
filled within thirty (30) days after it occurs, the Governor shall promptly fill the
vacancy by appointment of a qualified person who shall serve for the same period
as if otherwise appointed.
(7) No vacancy by reason of voluntary resignation in the office of mayor or on a
legislative body shall occur unless a written resignation which specifies a
resignation date is tendered to the legislative body. The resignation may be
submitted through electronic mail if it originates from the official's electronic mail
address and includes also the official's handwritten signature. The resignation shall
be effective at the next regular or special meeting of the city legislative body
occurring on or after the date specified in the written letter of resignation. If a
resignation date is not specified, the written resignation shall be deemed to become
effective at the first regular or special meeting of the legislative body occurring on
or after its receipt.
(8) Pursuant to KRS 118.305(7), if a vacancy occurs which is required by law to be
filled temporarily by appointment, the legislative body or the Governor, whichever
is designated to make the appointment, shall immediately notify in writing both the
county clerk and the Secretary of State of the vacancy.
(9) Except in cities of the first class, any elected officer, in case of misconduct,
incapacity, or willful neglect in the performance of the duties of his or her office,
may be removed from office by a unanimous vote of the members of the legislative
Page 3 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
body exclusive of any member to be removed, who shall not vote in the deliberation
of his or her removal. No elected officer shall be removed without having been
given the right to a full public hearing. The officer, if removed, shall have the right
to appeal to the Circuit Court of the county and the appeal shall be on the record.
No officer so removed shall be eligible to fill the office vacated before the
expiration of the term to which originally elected.
(10) Removal of an elected officer in cities of the first class shall be governed by the
provisions of KRS 83.660.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 116 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The State Board of Elections is authorized to enter into agreements with agencies
of the federal government to identify individuals who are not citizens of the
United States and who are registered to vote in this state.
(2) (a) Any agreement entered into in accordance with this section shall have its
terms agreed to in a written memorandum of understanding or similar
document signed by individuals authorized to do so from the federal agency
and the State Board of Elections.
(b) The document agreed to shall contain, at a minimum, provisions
guaranteeing the following:
1. The federal agency shall be provided with a copy of the roster of all
qualified registered voters within the state maintained by the State
Board of Elections pursuant to KRS 117.025;
2. The copy of the roster that is provided to the federal agency shall
include only the name, date of birth, and last four (4) digits of the
Social Security number, if available, of registered voters within the
state;
3. The copy of the roster that is provided to the federal agency shall not
Page 4 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
include any other information, including but not limited to the
residential or mailing address, driver's license number, voting history,
or political party affiliation of registered voters within the state; and
4. The federal agency shall be prohibited from acquiring a copy of the
roster under KRS 117.025(3)(i).
(3) For all individuals who are identified as being a noncitizen through an
agreement authorized by this section, the State Board of Elections shall:
(a) Mark the individual's registration in the roster of all qualified registered
voters maintained pursuant to KRS 117.025(3)(a) in such a way that
indicates on the voter registration system and any e-poll book that the
individual has been identified as a noncitizen; and
(b) Mail the individual a notice stating that he or she has been identified by the
federal government as being a noncitizen who is registered to vote in the
Commonwealth, and informing the individual of the steps he or she must
take before he or she may cast a ballot again.
(4) An individual identified as a noncitizen on the roster of qualified voters shall not
cast a ballot until his or her United States citizenship is verified. To verify his or
her United States citizenship, he or she shall present one (1) or more of the
following at the office of his or her county clerk or at a voting location:
(a) A United States birth certificate that meets all the following requirements:
1. Is issued by the city, county, or state of birth;
2. Lists the applicant's full name, date of birth, and place of birth;
3. Lists the applicant's parent or parents and their full names;
4. Has the signature of the city, county, or state registrar;
5. Has the date it was filed with the registrar's office; and
6. Has the seal or stamp of the city, county, or state in which it was
issued;
Page 5 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
(b) An undamaged United States passport that is or was valid for ten (10) years
for adults or five (5) years for children under sixteen (16) and does not
contain a United States National endorsement;
(c) A Consular Report of Birth Abroad or Certification of Birth;
(d) A Certificate of Naturalization; or
(e) A Certificate of Citizenship.
(5) If an individual identified as a noncitizen on the roster of qualified voters
presents documentation verifying his or her United States citizenship at his or her
county clerk's office, the county clerk shall make a copy of the documentation
presented and record the copy in the voter registration system. The county clerk
shall then immediately notify the State Board of Elections of the presented
documentation and the board shall remove the mark from the voter's registration
that indicates he or she was identified as a noncitizen on the roster of qualified
voters.
(6) If an individual identified as a noncitizen on the roster of qualified voters appears
at a voting location to vote, the election officer shall allow the voter to cast a
provisional ballot only after the voter has attested under penalty of perjury that he
or she is a United States citizen on a form provided by the State Board of
Elections.
(7) An individual identified as a noncitizen on the roster of qualified voters shall be
purged from the roster of qualified voters if the individual does not verify his or
her United States citizenship before the day after the date of the second general
election for federal office that occurs after the individual was identified as a
noncitizen on the roster of qualified voters.
(8) The voter registration of all individuals who are identified as being a noncitizen
through an agreement authorized by this section shall be forwarded by the State
Board of Elections to the Unit of Election Investigations and Security within the
Page 6 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
Office of the Attorney General. If the citizenship of an individual identified as a
noncitizen is later verified by the applicable federal agency or through the
procedures in this section, the State Board of Elections shall notify the Unit of
Election Investigations and Security within the Office of the Attorney General of
that fact.
Section 4. KRS 116.113 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon receipt of notification from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
or other reliable sources of the death of a person, the State Board of Elections
shall within five (5) days cause the removal of the name of that person from
the voter registration records it maintains, except that no voter's name may be
removed during the period of time the registration books are closed for any
primary, general, or special election.
(b) To ensure that the State Board of Elections accurately removes names from
the voter registration records it maintains, the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services shall provide a copy of the lifetime Kentucky death records to the
State Board of Elections on or before July 1 of each year.
(2) Upon receipt of notification from the circuit clerk that a person has been declared
incompetent, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the
removal of the name of that person from the voter registration records it maintains,
except that no voter's name may be removed during the period of time the
registration books are closed for any primary, general, or special election.
(3) Upon receipt of notification from the Administrative Office of the Courts that a
person has been excused from jury duty for not being a citizen of the United States,
the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the removal of the
name of that person from the voter registration records it maintains, except that no
voter's name may be removed during the period of time the registration books are
closed for any primary, general, or special election.
Page 7 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
(4) Upon receipt of notification from the Administrative Office of the Courts or the
United States Department of Justice that a person has been convicted of a felony
offense, including persons convicted of a felony offense whose case is currently
on appeal, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the removal
of the name of that person from the voter registration records it maintains, except
that no voter's name may be removed during the period of time the registration
books are closed for any primary, general, or special election.
(5) Upon receipt of notification from a local or state jurisdiction that a voter has
registered to vote in the new local or state jurisdiction outside of the
Commonwealth, the State Board of Elections shall within five (5) days cause the
removal of the name of that person from the voter registration records that it
maintains, except that no voter's name may be removed during the period of time
the registration books are closed for any primary, regular election, or special
election.
(6) (a) Following the purge of a name from the records of the State Board of
Elections:[,]
1. The state board shall notify the clerk of the county in which the voter
lived of the action; and
2. The county clerk shall within ten (10) days update the county voter
registration files to reflect the necessary change.
(b) 1. If a protest is filed by the voter, the county board shall hear it at its next
regular monthly meeting.
2. If the county board decides in favor of the protesting voter, the voter's
registration record shall be restored, including his or her voting record.
3. If the protest is filed while the registration books are closed and the
county board decides in favor of the protesting voter, the county board
shall issue the voter an "Authorization to Vote" for the upcoming
Page 8 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
election and the voter's record shall be restored when the registration
books open following the election.
Section 5. KRS 117.125 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] voting system or voting equipment shall be approved for use[ after January
1, 2024,] by the State Board of Elections, either upon initial examination or
reexamination, and[ no] voting equipment or a voting system shall not be
purchased[ after July 14, 2022,] unless the system and equipment has been certified
under KRS 117.379 and is so constructed that it shall:
(a)[(1)] Ensure secrecy to the voter in the act of voting so that no person can see
or know for whom any other voter has voted or is voting, except for those
voters requiring assistance under KRS 117.255;
(b)[(2)] Permit votes to be cast for any candidate entitled to have his or her name
printed upon the ballots at any primary, regular election, or special election,
and for or against any public question entitled to be placed upon the ballots;
(c)[(3)] Except at a primary, permit a voter to vote for all the candidates of one
(1) party or for one (1) or more candidates of every party having candidates
entitled to be voted for, or for one (1) or more independent, political
organization, or political group candidates;
(d)[(4)] Permit a voter to vote for as many persons for an office as the voter is
lawfully entitled to vote for, and no more;
(e)[(5)] Prevent a voter from voting for more persons for any office than the
voter is entitled to vote for, and from voting for the same person, or for or
against the same question, more than once;
(f)[(6)] Permit a voter to vote for or against any question the voter may have the
right to vote on, but no other;
(g)[(7)] Provide for a nonpartisan ballot;
(h)[(8)] Be capable of being adjusted for use in a primary so that a voter may not
Page 9 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
vote for any person except those seeking nomination as candidates of the
voter's party, as candidates for a nonpartisan office, or as candidates for an
office of the Court of Justice;
(i)[(9)] Permit each voter to vote for all the candidates for presidential electors
of any party by one (1) operation;
(j)[(10)] Permit each voter to vote, in any regular or special election, for any
person for whom the voter desires to vote whose name does not appear upon
the ballot by providing a method of write-in voting;
(k)[(11)] Be safe, efficient, and accurate in the conduct of elections, and correctly
register and accurately count all votes cast for each person, and for or against
each public question;
(l) 1.[(12) (a)] Provide each voter an opportunity to verify votes recorded
on the permanent paper ballot, either visually or using assistive voting
technology, by producing a voter-verified paper audit trail;
2.[(b)] Provide each voter an opportunity to change votes or correct any
error before the voter's ballot is cast and counted; and
3.[(c)] Provide a voter who spoils his or her ballot another ballot as
provided under this chapter;
(m)[(13)] Use an individual, discrete, permanent, paper ballot cast by the voter for
tabulating purposes;
(n)[(14)] Preserve the paper ballot as an official record available for use in any
audit or recount;
(o)[(15)] Be suitably designed for the purpose used, constructed of a durable
material, and safely transportable;
(p)[(16)] Be capable of determining whether the voting equipment has been
unlocked and operated or adjusted in any manner after once being locked;
(q)[(17)] Have a public counter with a register which is visible from the outside
Page 10 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
of the counter or device that will show at all times during an election how
many persons have voted;
(r)[(18)] Have a protective cumulative counter indicating the number of votes
cast for each person, and the votes cast for or against each public question
which cannot be seen, reset, or tampered with without unlocking a covering
device by a key or other security apparatus that cannot unlock any other part
of the equipment, and which prevents changes to the cumulative counter once
the system has been put into operation on the day of any election;
(s)[(19)] Provide for the tabulating of votes at the precinct as required under KRS
117.275;
(t)[(20)] Provide locks or other security apparatus by which the operation of the
voting equipment may be locked before the time for opening the polls and
after the time for closing the polls;
(u)[(21)] Permit a voter to readily learn the method of operating it, to
expeditiously cast a vote for all candidates and on all questions of the voter's
choice, and when operated properly, register and record correctly and
accurately every vote cast;
(v)[(22)] Bear a number or other unique designation that will distinguish it from
any other voting equipment or voting system;
(w)[(23)] Produce a real-time audit log record for the voting system, and produce
a paper record with a manual audit capacity which shall be available as an
official record for any recount conducted related to any primary or election in
which the system is used;
(x)[(24)] Be accessible for individuals with impairments, including nonvisual
accessibility for the blind or visually impaired, in a manner that provides the
same opportunity for access and participation, including privacy and
independence, as for other voters;
Page 11 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
(y)[(25)] Prohibit voting equipment that tabulates or aggregates votes used in
official results from connecting to any network, including the internet, or
communicating with any device external to the voting system;
(z) Prohibit voting equipment that utilizes nonhuman readable codes, including
but not limited to barcodes, QR codes, or other encrypted markings, to
represent or tabulate a voter's choices;
(aa)[(26)] Meet or exceed the standards for a voting system established by the
Election Assistance Commission, as amended from time to time, and those
approved under KRS 117.379; and
(ab)[(27)] Meet such other requirements as may be established by the State Board
of Elections in administrative regulations promulgated in accordance
with[under] KRS Chapter 13A to reflect changes in technology to ensure the
integrity and security of voting systems.
(2) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, continued use
of a voting system and all voting equipment that was approved for use by the State
Board of Elections as of the effective date of this Act, and was utilized by a county
before the effective date of this Act, shall be allowed until such time as a
replacement voting system is acquired by the county.
Section 6. KRS 117.155 is amended to read as follows:
The county clerk shall place all ballots required to be placed upon voting equipment in
such a manner as will most nearly conform to the plan of arrangement prescribed by the
Secretary of State under KRS 118.215. The county clerk shall then see that the counters
referred to in KRS 117.125(1)(q)[(17)] and (1)(r)[(18)] are set at zero, and shall lock the
operating device and mechanism and the devices protecting the counters and ballots,
which shall then be covered with a tamper-resistant seal. The county clerk shall then
enter in an appropriate book, opposite the number of each precinct the distinguishing
number of the voting equipment or the unique designation to be used in that precinct.
Page 12 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
Section 7. KRS 117.205 is amended to read as follows:
Before the polls are open, and before permitting any person to vote on the day of the
election, the election officers shall examine the voting equipment to ascertain whether it
has been operated since the counters referred to in KRS 117.125(1)(q)[(17)] and
(1)(r)[(18)] were set at zero, and to ascertain whether the ballots are arranged as
previously specified. If the voting equipment indicates that it has been operated or if the
ballots are not properly arranged, the officers shall not unlock the operating device or
mechanism, but shall immediately secure the attendance of the county clerk and one (1)
member of the county board of elections other than the county clerk, who shall reset the
counters at zero and relock the device covering the counters, or properly arrange the
ballots, as the case may be, in the presence of the election officers. If the attendance of
members of the board of elections cannot be obtained before the opening of the polls or
within one (1) hour thereafter, the election officers shall notify the county clerk of the
foregoing facts and obtain from the county clerk reserve voting equipment, and proceed
to conduct the election. Any reserve voting equipment shall have been certified for use at
the election by the county board of elections and prepared for use at the election by the
election officers in the precinct in the same manner as the original voting equipment was
prepared for the election. The voting equipment found to have been so operated shall be
returned immediately to the custody of the county clerk, whose duty it shall be to
promptly repair same so that it may be used as reserve voting equipment in the election if
needed.
Section 8. KRS 117.383 is amended to read as follows:
The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with[under] KRS Chapter 13A which shall maintain the maximum degree of correctness,
impartiality, and efficiency of the procedures of voting and shall provide methods to:
(1) Count, tabulate, and record votes;
(2) Place items on any ballot which shall, as closely as possible, follow the
Page 13 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
requirements pertaining to ballots;
(3) Design the ballots to include a system to ensure an accurate record of all voting
activities;
(4) Instruct voters in the use of the voting system, including any ballot marking device;
(5) Provide for checking the accuracy of the voting system;
(6) Provide necessary supplies, including those necessary for a write-in vote, to ensure
voter privacy;
(7) Provide for the conducting and review of an audit of any component of a voting
system or any voting equipment, and a review of any audit log;
(8) Provide for the conducting and review of an election audit which shall establish the
protocol by which ballots are checked, compared, and verified with the results
produced by vote tallying equipment to ensure accuracy through a hand-to-eye
audit defined and conducted as follows:
(a) To validate the accuracy and fidelity of the vote tabulation, the Secretary of
State or his or her designee shall randomly select, in all counties of the
Commonwealth, one (1) ballot scanner and one (1) race tabulated on that
scanner, which shall have more than ten (10) votes cast, for a hand-to-eye
audit to be performed by each county board of elections or its designee.
Counties shall send a list for selection to the Secretary of State's Office that
only includes ballot scanners which recorded more than ten (10) votes cast;
(b) The sealed ballot boxes and signed tabulator tally tape or record from election
day, as established in KRS 117.275, shall be provided by the county board of
elections at an agreed upon location, and shall be accessible for public
viewing. The sealed ballots are only to be unsealed in the presence of the
county board of elections or its designee and public witnesses;
(c) A minimum of two (2) qualified poll workers, not of the same political party,
shall be selected from lists of available volunteers, sworn in by the county
Page 14 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
board of elections or its designee to do the hand-to-eye audit, and
compensated at the local poll worker rate. A video recording device shall be
used for recording the event and it may be streamed for public internet
viewing. A request under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to
61.884, for this video after an election shall be made during the sixty (60)
consecutive days following the election, and the video may be disposed of
after those sixty (60) days, or upon compliance with the Kentucky Open
Records Act or the closure of an investigation or any litigation, including
appeals, in a District, Circuit, or federal court, whichever is later;
(d) Ballots are to be aligned for stacking as needed, then viewed one (1) at a time,
with each volunteer making a tally mark on a tally sheet for each vote cast for
each candidate. Any ballots that are disputed or unclearly marked shall be set
aside and the county board of elections or its designee shall determine voter
intent;
(e) Once the hand-to-eye audit is completed, each volunteer shall add up the tally
marks for each candidate, write down a total number of votes for each
candidate, and sign the tally sheet. The county board of elections or its
designee shall verify if the two (2) separate hand-to-eye tallies match. If the
two (2) hand-to-eye tallies do not match each other, the process must be
repeated until the totals are matching. Once this occurs, the county board of
elections or its designee shall also verify the tallies by signing each tally sheet.
Then, the ballots must be returned to the ballot box and resealed in the
presence of the county board of elections or its designee and public witnesses;
(f) The county board of elections or its designee shall compare the signed register
tape total from the vote tabulation machine on election day to the hand-to-eye
tallies. If there is a discrepancy between the machine count and the hand-to-
eye audit, other than instances of voter intent markings outside the designated
Page 15 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
marking area on the paper ballot that were unreadable by the scanner, or
unscanned overvotes resulting from two (2) or more voter intent marks on the
same race, the county board of elections or its designee shall open an election
investigation including a review of election day irregularity reports. If more
discrepancies are found, the county board of elections or its designee shall
broaden the investigation until the reason for the discrepancy is discovered
and subsequently resolved. A determination as to whether the outcome of the
race could have been impacted by the discrepancies shall be made and any
findings shall be reported to the Attorney General and Secretary of State; and
(g) The county board of elections or its designee shall examine the electronic or
paper sign-in records from the precinct or vote center and validate that the
ballots cast and recounted were less than or equal to the sign-in records for
that precinct or vote center. If the cast ballots for the precinct or vote center
exceed the number of voters on the sign-in records for the precinct or vote
center, the county board of elections shall open an election investigation and
report the findings to the Attorney General and Secretary of State;
(9) Provide a method for maintaining sufficient documents, including ballots and
records, so that votes can be recounted;
(10) Ensure the county board of elections produces accurate precinct-by-precinct
summaries of tabulation sheets showing the results of each precinct during in-
person absentee voting, election day voting, and when a county is approved to use a
vote center;
(11) Except as otherwise required in this chapter, all records and papers relating to
specified elections be retained for twenty-two (22) months, such documents and
records shall be maintained for thirty (30) days following an election; and
(12) Unless contrary to the Help America Vote Act of 2002, ensure that all federal
provisional voting shall be conducted in a manner as prescribed by KRS Chapters
Page 16 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
116 to 120.
Section 9. KRS 118.176 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A "bona fide" candidate means one who is seeking nomination in a primary or
election in a special or regular election according to law.
(2) The bona fides of any candidate seeking nomination as the nominee of a political
party or a nonpartisan or judicial nominee in a primary or election to an office as a
member of a political organization, political group, or as an independent in a special
or regular election may be questioned by any qualified voter entitled to vote for the
candidate or by an opposing candidate by summary proceedings consisting of a
motion before the Circuit Court of the judicial circuit in which the candidate whose
bona fides is questioned resides. An action regarding the bona fides of the nominee
of a political party or a nonpartisan or judicial nominee may be commenced at any
time prior to the primary. An action regarding the bona fides for election to an
office as a member of a political organization, political group, or as an independent
may be commenced at any time prior to a special or regular election. The motion
shall be tried summarily and without delay. Proof may be heard orally, and upon
motion of either party shall be officially reported. If the Circuit Judge of the circuit
in which the proceeding is filed is disqualified or absent from the county or is
herself or himself a candidate, the proceeding may be presented to, heard and
determined by the Circuit Judge of any adjoining judicial circuit.
(3) In any action or proceeding under this section the burden of proof as to the bona
fides of a candidate shall be on the person challenging the bona fides of a candidate.
(4) If the court finds the candidate is not a bona fide candidate:
(a) It shall so order, and certify the fact to the board of elections, and the
candidate's name shall be stricken from the written designation of election
officers filed with the board of elections or the court may refuse recognition
or relief in a mandatory or injunctive way;[.]
Page 17 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
(b) The order of the Circuit Court shall be entered on the order book of the court
and shall be subject to a motion to set aside in the Court of Appeals. The
motion shall be heard by the Court of Appeals or a judge thereof in the
manner provided for dissolving or granting injunctions, except that the motion
shall be made before the court or judge within five (5) days after the entry of
the order in the Circuit Court, and may be heard and tried upon the original
papers, and the order of the Court of Appeals or judge thereof shall be final;
and
(c) The person bringing the action shall be entitled to and awarded his or her
reasonable attorney's fees, expert witness fees, and other court costs for trial
and appeal, and those fees and costs shall be taxed against the candidate or
his or her campaign committee after the timely filing of a bill of costs with
the Circuit Court.
(5) No person shall approach the Circuit Judge for the purpose or view of influencing
his or her decision on the motion pending before the Circuit Judge or to be tried by
him or her.
Section 10. KRS 118.405 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No candidate's name shall appear on any ballot, including any federal provisional
ballot, federal provisional absentee ballot, or absentee ballot more than once, except
that a candidate's name may appear twice if he or she:
(a) Is a candidate for a primary or a regular election and also a candidate to fill a
vacancy in the same office required to be filled at a special election, when the
special election to fill a vacancy is scheduled for the regular election day; or
(b) Is a candidate for two (2) different federal offices on the same ballot, if one
(1) of the offices is decided by the United States Electoral College and the
person currently holds an elected federal office.
(2) Subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not be construed to permit a person to hold
Page 18 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
two (2) incompatible offices simultaneously in violation of the Constitution of the
United States, Constitution of Kentucky, or any applicable state or federal law.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 118A IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A candidate for judicial office may publicly disclose his or her political party
affiliation, including but not limited to:
(a) Identifying themselves as a member of a political party;
(b) Stating current voter registration status or past or current party affiliation;
and
(c) Communicating political values or viewpoints consistent with his or her
party affiliation.
(2) A candidate for judicial office shall not:
(a) Claim to be the official nominee of a political party for judicial office;
(b) Use language or materials that imply nomination, designation, or
endorsement by a political party; or
(c) Use party symbols, slogans, or imagery in a manner that would mislead a
reasonable person to believe the candidate is running in a partisan election
or was selected by a political party to represent it.
(3) This section shall not be construed to authorize partisan elections for judicial
office or to permit political party nomination, designation, or ballot labeling of
candidates for judicial office.
Section 12. KRS 120.165 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A contest instituted under KRS 120.155 shall proceed as equity actions. Upon
return of the summons properly executed to the office of the circuit clerk, he or she
shall immediately docket the case and notify the presiding judge of the court that
the contest has been filed. The judge shall proceed to a trial of the cause without
delay. In courts having more than one (1) judge, the judge who shall try the case
Page 19 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
shall be determined by lot. The court shall complete the case as soon as practicable.
The action shall have precedence over all other cases.
(2) The evidence in chief for the contestant shall be completed within thirty (30) days
after service of summons; the evidence for the contestee shall be completed within
twenty-five (25) days after filing of answer, and evidence for contestant in rebuttal
shall be completed within seven (7) days after the contestee has concluded;
provided that for cause the court may grant a reasonable extension of time to either
party.
(3) All voting machines, voting equipment, or voting systems, ballots, stub books, and
other papers concerning which there is any ground for contest may be removed to
the court in which the action is pending.
(4) If it appears from an inspection of the whole record that there has been such fraud,
intimidation, bribery, or violence in the conduct of the election that neither
contestant nor contestee can be judged to have been fairly elected, the Circuit
Court, or an appellate court[,] on appeal, may adjudge that there has been no
election. In that event the office shall be deemed vacant, with the same legal effect
as if the person elected had refused to qualify. In the event a majority of the offices
of a legislative body are deemed vacant under subsection (5)(b) of Section 2 of
this Act, the county clerk and local board of elections shall call a special election
of the bona fide candidates who previously qualified as soon as practicable,
within at least forty-five (45) days of the declaration of vacancies becoming final
orders. If one (1) of the parties is adjudged by the court to be elected to the office,
he or she shall, on production of a copy of the final judgment, be permitted to
qualify or be commissioned.
(5) If an election contest brought under this section is successful, as determined by
the Circuit Court or an appellate court on appeal, the contestant shall be entitled
to recover reasonable attorney's fees, expert witness fees, and other court costs.
Page 20 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
The fees and costs shall be taxed by the court against the local board of elections
or against any party adjudicated to have engaged in fraud, intimidation, bribery,
or violence that prevented either the contestant or contestee from being fairly
elected.
Section 13. KRS 121.015 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Registry" means the Kentucky Registry of Election Finance;
(2) "Election" means any primary, regular, or special election to fill vacancies
regardless of whether a candidate or slate of candidates is opposed or unopposed in
an election. Each primary, regular, or special election shall be considered a separate
election;
(3) "Committee" includes the following:
(a) "Campaign committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more
specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any
state, county, city, or district office, that is authorized by the candidate or slate
of candidates to receive contributions, make expenditures, and generally
conduct a campaign for the candidate or slate of candidates, but does not
include an entity established solely by a candidate which is managed solely by
a candidate and a campaign treasurer and whose name is generic in nature,
such as "Friends of (the candidate)," and does not reflect that other persons
have structured themselves as a committee, designated officers of the
committee, and assigned responsibilities and duties to each officer with the
purpose of managing a campaign to support or oppose a candidate in an
election;
(b) "Independent expenditure-only committee," which means one (1) or more
persons who receive unlimited contributions for the purpose of making only
Page 21 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
independent expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more specific
candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any state,
county, city, or district office;
(c) "Caucus campaign committee," which means members of one (1) of the
following caucus groups who receive contributions and make expenditures to
support or oppose one (1) or more specific candidates or slates of candidates
for nomination or election, or a committee:
1. House Democratic caucus campaign committee;
2. House Republican caucus campaign committee;
3. Senate Democratic caucus campaign committee;
4. Senate Republican caucus campaign committee; or
5. Subdivisions of the state executive committee of a minor political party,
which serve the same function as the above-named committees, as
determined by regulations promulgated by the registry;
(d) "Political issues committee," which means three (3) or more persons joining
together to advocate or oppose a ballot measure if that committee receives or
expends money in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(e) "Permanent committee," which means a group of individuals, including an
association, committee, or organization, other than a campaign committee,
independent expenditure-only committee, federally registered political
committee, political issues committee, inaugural committee, caucus campaign
committee, or party executive committee, which is established as, or intended
to be, a permanent organization having as a primary purpose expressly
advocating the election or defeat of one (1) or more clearly identified
candidates, slates of candidates, or political parties, which functions on a
regular basis throughout the year;
(f) [An ]"Executive committee of a political party," which means a political
Page 22 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
committee that is a subdivision of a national political party committee and
operates within the structure and under the supervision of the state
executive committee of that same political party. Political parties may
support candidates for public office, raise and spend money for their
internal operations, and are governed by a committee that is elected by the
voters in that subdivision in a manner not inconsistent with the rules of that
same political party; and
(g) "Inaugural committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
contributions and make expenditures in support of inauguration activities for
any candidate or slate of candidates elected to any state, county, city, or
district office;
(4) "Contributing organization" means a group which merely contributes to candidates,
slates of candidates, campaign committees, caucus campaign committees, or
executive committees from time to time from funds derived solely from within the
group, and which does not solicit or receive funds from sources outside the group
itself. Any contributions made by the groups in excess of one hundred dollars
($100) shall be reported to the registry;
(5) "Testimonial affair" means an affair held in honor of a person who holds or who is
or was a candidate for nomination or election to a political office in this state
designed to raise funds for any purpose not charitable, religious, or educational;
(6) "Contribution" means any:
(a) Payment, distribution, loan, deposit, or gift of money or other thing of value,
to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of candidates, its authorized agent, a
committee, or contributing organization. As used in this subsection, "loan"
shall include a guarantee, endorsement, or other form of security where the
risk of nonpayment rests with the surety, guarantor, or endorser, as well as
with a committee, contributing organization, candidate, slate of candidates, or
Page 23 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
other primary obligor. No person shall become liable as surety, endorser, or
guarantor for any sum in any one (1) election which, when combined with all
other contributions the individual makes to a candidate, his or her agent, a
slate of candidates, its agent, a committee, or a contributing organization,
exceeds the contribution limits provided in KRS 121.150;
(b) Payment by any person other than the candidate, his or her authorized
treasurer, a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or a
contributing organization, of compensation for the personal services of
another person which are rendered to a candidate, slate of candidates,
committee, or contributing organization, or for inauguration activities;
(c) Goods, advertising, or services with a value of more than one hundred dollars
($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are furnished to a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization or for
inauguration activities without charge, or at a rate which is less than the rate
normally charged for the goods or services; or
(d) Payment by any person other than a candidate, his or her authorized treasurer,
a slate of candidates, its authorized treasurer, a committee, or contributing
organization for any goods or services with a value of more than one hundred
dollars ($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are utilized by a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, or for
inauguration activities;
(7) Notwithstanding the foregoing meanings of "contribution," the word shall not be
construed to include:
(a) Services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion
or all of their time on behalf of a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee,
or contributing organization;
(b) A loan of money by any financial institution doing business in Kentucky
Page 24 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
made in accordance with applicable banking laws and regulations and in the
ordinary course of business;[ or]
(c) An independent expenditure by any individual or permanent committee; or
(d) Any processing fee, transaction fee, or service charge deducted by a third-
party payment processor, credit card issuer, or electronic payment service,
provided that the fee is a standard commercial charge for the service
rendered;
(8) "Candidate" means any person who has received contributions or made
expenditures, has appointed a campaign treasurer, or has given his or her consent
for any other person to receive contributions or make expenditures with a view to
bringing about his or her nomination or election to a nonfederal public office,
except as provided in KRS 121.180(10)(b);
(9) "Slate of candidates" means:
(a) Between the time a certificate or petition of nomination has been filed for a
candidate for the office of Governor under KRS 118.365 and the time the
candidate designates a running mate for the office of Lieutenant Governor
under KRS 118.126, a slate of candidates consists of the candidate for the
office of Governor; and
(b) After that candidate has designated a running mate under KRS 118.126, that
same slate of candidates consists of that same candidate for the office of
Governor and the candidate's running mate for the office of Lieutenant
Governor. Unless the context requires otherwise, any provision of law that
applies to a candidate shall also apply to a slate of candidates;
(10) "Knowingly" means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a
statute defining an offense, that a person is aware or should have been aware that
his or her conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists;
(11) "Fundraiser" means an individual who directly solicits and secures contributions on
Page 25 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
behalf of a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office or an
office in a jurisdiction with a population in excess of two hundred thousand
(200,000) residents;
(12) "Independent expenditure" means:
(a) The expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which
expressly advocates the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or
slate of candidates, and which:
1. Is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any
candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized
person acting on behalf of any of them; and
2. Is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of any
candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized
person acting on behalf of any of them; or
(b) The expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which
expressly advocates or opposes a ballot measure, and which:
1. Is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any
political issues committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of
a political issues committee; and
2. Is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, any
political issues committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of
a political issues committee;
(13) "Electronic reporting" means the use of technology, having electrical, digital,
magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities, by which an
individual or other entity submits, compiles, or transmits campaign finance reports
to the registry, or by which the registry receives, stores, analyzes, or discloses the
reports;
(14) "Security procedure" means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that
Page 26 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
an electronic signature, record, or performance is that of a specific person or for
detecting changes or errors in the information in an electronic record. The term
includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying
words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures;
(15) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or
logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the
intent to sign the record;
(16) "Filer" means any candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, or other individual or
entity required to submit financial disclosure reports to the registry;
(17) "Filer-side software" means software provided to or used by the filer that enables
transmittal of financial reports to the registry;
(18) "Form" means an online web page or an electronic document designed to capture,
validate, and submit data for processing to the registry, unless the context otherwise
prescribes;
(19) "Reasonable cause" means an event, happening, or circumstance entirely beyond
the knowledge or control of the candidate, slate of candidates, or committee, which
has exercised due care and prudence in maintaining the records of the campaign or
committee pursuant to statute or administrative regulation;
(20) "Foreign national" means:
(a) An individual who is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United
States;
(b) A government, political subdivision, or municipality of a foreign country;
(c) A foreign political party;
(d) Any entity, including but not limited to a partnership, association, corporation,
organization, or other combination of persons, that is organized under the
laws of or has its principal place of business in a foreign country; or
(e) Any entity in the United States, including but not limited to a partnership,
Page 27 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
association, corporation, or organization that is wholly or majority owned by
any foreign national, unless:
1. Any contribution or expenditure the entity makes derives entirely from
funds generated by the entity's United States operations; and
2. All decisions concerning the contribution or expenditure, except for
setting overall budget amounts, are made by individuals who are United
States citizens or permanent residents;
(21) "Ballot measure" means a question, other than the nomination or election of a
candidate for public office, which has been:
(a) Approved by a political subdivision or the General Assembly and is required
by law to be placed before the voters of the territory affected; or
(b) Initiated or referred by citizen petition as authorized by KRS 242.020 and
placed before the voters of the territory affected;
(22) "Preliminary activity" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Participating in focus groups;
(b) Making telephone calls;
(c) Traveling;
(d) Conducting polls; and
(e) Drafting ballot measure language; and
(23) "Tax-exempt organization" means an organization described in 26 U.S.C. sec.
501(c) and exempt from federal taxation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(a). This
subsection shall not be construed to treat a political organization under 26 U.S.C.
sec. 527 as a tax-exempt organization for purposes of this chapter.
Section 14. KRS 121.065 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No publisher of newspapers, magazines, handbills, or other printed matter, owner or
lessor of billboards, radio or television station or network, digital media platform,
or any other person, company, corporation, or organization offering its
Page 28 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
communications services for hire to the public shall be permitted to charge fees for
political advertising in excess of the lowest rate charged to other advertisers at the
time the political advertising is purchased.
(2) Political advertising means any communication intended to support or defeat a
candidate for public office.
(3) An action to enjoin violations of this section shall be in the Circuit Court of the
county where the complaining candidate resides.
Section 15. KRS 121.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created as an independent agency of state government a Kentucky
Registry of Election Finance. The registry shall be composed of seven (7) members
appointed as provided herein. The registry shall remain independent of any other
agency or department of state government. Members shall be at least twenty-five
(25) years of age, registered voters in Kentucky, not announced candidates for
public office, not officers of a political party's state central executive committee,
shall not have been convicted of an election offense, and shall be persons of high
ethical standards who have an active interest in promoting fair elections.
Appointees shall be subject to Senate confirmation at the next regular session of the
General Assembly following appointment, or at the next special session if included
in the Governor's call. Appointees shall have full power to serve until any vote of
nonconfirmation.
(2) Members of the registry shall be selected as follows:
(a) One (1) member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
nominees submitted by the state central committee of the political party
polling the largest vote at the last gubernatorial election;[.]
(b) One (1) member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3)
nominees submitted by the state central committee of the political party
polling the second largest vote at the last gubernatorial election. The members
Page 29 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
appointed pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall take office
on August 15, 1990, for a term of one (1) year and their successors shall serve
a term of four (4) years beginning August 15, 1991, or until their successors
are appointed and qualified;[.]
(c) Two (2) other members shall be appointed by the Governor. Before making
these appointments, the Governor shall solicit nominations from at least two
(2) organizations which have demonstrated a nonpartisan interest in fair
elections and informed voting. The Governor's solicitations and the replies
shall be public records. The Governor shall give due consideration to such
nominations. The two (2) members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall
be one (1) from each of the two (2) political parties which polled the greatest
number of votes at the last gubernatorial election. Members appointed
pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15, 1988, for a term of
four (4) years or until their successors are appointed and qualified and their
successors shall serve a term of four (4) years.
(d) One (1) member shall be appointed by the Auditor of Public Accounts after
soliciting nominations as provided by subsection (c) of this section. The
appointee shall be a member of one (1) of the two (2) political parties which
polled the greatest number of votes at the last gubernatorial election. The
member appointed pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15,
1997, for a term of four (4) years or until his successor is appointed and
qualified and his successors shall serve a term of four (4) years;[.]
(e) One (1) member shall be appointed by the Attorney General after soliciting
nominations as provided by subsection (c) of this section. The appointee shall
not be a member of the same political party as the person appointed by the
Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. The
member appointed pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15,
Page 30 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
1990, for a term of four (4) years or until his successor is appointed and
qualified and his successors shall serve a term of four (4) years; and[.]
(f) One (1) member shall be appointed by the Secretary of State after soliciting
nominations as provided by subsection (c) of this section. The Secretary of
State's appointment shall be without regard to political affiliation. The
member appointed pursuant to this subsection shall take office on August 15,
1990, for a term of three (3) years or until his successor is appointed and
qualified and his successors shall serve a term of four (4) years.
(3) The members of the registry shall select a chairman from among the appointed
membership, effective August 15, 1990. The chairman shall serve in that capacity
for one (1) year and shall be eligible for reelection. The chairman shall preside at all
meetings and shall have all the powers and privileges of the other members.
(4) In the event of a vacancy in the office of any member, the vacancy shall be filled
within thirty (30) days of the occurrence, in the same manner as the vacating
member's office was filled pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The registry shall fix the place and time of its regular meetings by order duly
recorded in its minutes. No action shall be taken without a quorum present. Special
meetings shall be called by the chairman on his own initiative or on the written
request of three (3) members. Members shall receive seven (7) days' written notice
of a special meeting and the notice shall specify the purpose, time and place of the
meeting, and no other matters may be considered, without a specific waiver by all
the members.
(6) The members of the registry[ shall receive sixty-five dollars ($65) per diem, and]
shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and expenses in the same manner as state
employees[all reasonable and necessary expenses].
Section 16. KRS 121.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the sworn complaint of any person, or on its own initiative, the registry shall
Page 31 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
investigate alleged violations of campaign finance law. In conducting any
investigation, the registry shall have the power of subpoena and may compel
production of evidence including the financial records of any person determined by
the registry to be vital to the investigation. The records subject to subpoena include,
but are not limited to, a person's bank records and other relevant documents, but
excluding individual and business income tax records.
(2) If the registry concludes that there is probable cause to believe that the law has been
violated, the registry shall notify the alleged violator of its conclusions and the
evidence supporting them, and shall offer the alleged violator a conciliation
agreement to resolve the issue. A conciliation agreement may require the alleged
violator to comply with one (1) or more of the following:
(a) To cease and desist violations of the law;
(b) To file required reports or other documents or information;
(c) To pay a penalty not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) a day, up to a
maximum total fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000), for failure to file any
report, payment of an administrative fee, or other document or information
required by law until the report, fee payment, document, or information is
filed; except that there shall be no maximum total fine for candidates for
statewide office; or
(d) To pay a penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation for
acts of noncompliance with provisions contained within this chapter.
(3) No monetary penalty under subsection (2) of this section for failure to file any
report, payment of an administrative fee, or other documentation or information
required by law shall begin to accrue or be assessed until five (5) business days
after the registry has provided notice of the delinquency to the candidate or the
campaign treasurer. If the violation is corrected within the five (5) business days
following the registry's notice, no penalty shall be assessed.
Page 32 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
(4) To accept a conciliation agreement, an alleged violator shall deliver the signed
agreement to the registry either in person or by mail postmarked not later than ten
(10) days after the day he received it. The registry may institute a civil action in
Franklin Circuit Court or the Circuit Court for the county of the violator's residence
to enforce the provisions of any conciliation agreement accepted by a violator who
is not complying with its provisions.
(5)[(4)] If the alleged violator declines to accept the conciliation agreement or fails to
respond within the time allowed, the registry shall conduct an administrative
hearing. The provisions of KRS Chapter 13B shall apply to all registry
administrative hearings except for the provisions of KRS 13B.030(2)(b). A party
adversely affected by the registry's final order may appeal to Franklin Circuit Court
within thirty (30) days after the date of the registry's final order. The violator may
be ordered to comply with any one (1) or more of the following requirements:
(a) To cease and desist violation of this law;
(b) To file any reports or other documents or information required by this law;
(c) To pay a penalty not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) a day, up to a
maximum total fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000), for failure to file any
report, payment of an administrative fee, or other document or information
required by law until the report, fee payment, document, or information is
filed; except that there shall be no maximum total fine for candidates for
statewide office; or
(d) To pay a penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation for
acts of noncompliance with provisions contained within this chapter. An
appeal of an order shall be advanced on the docket to permit a timely
decision.
(6)[(5)] If the registry concludes that there is probable cause to believe that the
campaign finance law has been violated knowingly, it shall refer the violation to the
Page 33 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
Attorney General or the appropriate Commonwealth's or county attorney for
prosecution. The Attorney General may request the registry's attorney or the
appropriate county or Commonwealth's attorney to prosecute the matter and may
request from the registry all evidence collected in its investigation. In the event the
Attorney General or the appropriate local prosecutor fails to prosecute in a timely
fashion, the registry may petition the Circuit Court to appoint the registry's attorney
to prosecute, and upon a motion timely filed, for good cause shown, the court shall
enter an order to that effect. Prosecutions involving campaign finance law
violations, in which the reports are required to be filed in Frankfort, may be
conducted in Franklin Circuit Court or in the Circuit Court for the county in which
the contribution or expenditure constituting a campaign finance violation was
solicited, made, or accepted. The prosecution of a person who unlawfully solicits,
makes, or accepts a contribution or expenditure through the use of the mail may be
conducted in the Circuit Court for the county in which the solicitation is mailed, the
county in which the contribution is mailed or received, or the county in which the
expenditure is mailed.
(7)[(6)] If judicial review is sought of any action of the registry relating to a pending
election, the matter shall be advanced on the docket of the court. The court may
take any steps authorized by law to accelerate its procedures so as to permit a
timely decision.
Section 17. KRS 121.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No contribution shall be made or received, directly or indirectly, other than an
independent expenditure, to support inauguration activities or to support or defeat a
candidate, slate of candidates, constitutional amendment, or public question which
will appear on the ballot in an election, except through the duly appointed campaign
manager, or campaign treasurer of the candidate, slate of candidates, or registered
committee. Any person making an independent expenditure, shall report these
Page 34 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
expenditures when the expenditures by that person exceed five hundred dollars
($500) in the aggregate in any one (1) election, on a form provided or using a
format approved by the registry and shall sign a statement on the form, under
penalty of perjury, that the expenditure was an actual independent expenditure and
that there was no prior communication with the campaign on whose behalf it was
made.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 121.180(10), the solicitation from and contributions by
campaign committees, independent expenditure-only committees, caucus campaign
committees, political issues committees, permanent committees, and party
executive committees to any religious, charitable, civic, eleemosynary, or other
causes or organizations established primarily for the public good is expressly
prohibited; except that it shall not be construed as a violation of this section for:
(a) A candidate or a slate of candidates to contribute to religious, civic, or
charitable groups; or
(b) A state or county executive committee of a political party to contribute up to
one hundred dollars ($100) per year to a nonprofit civic organization if the
organization promotes civic education, voter registration efforts, or patriotic
events.
(3) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor
anyone acting on their behalf, shall accept any anonymous contribution in excess of
one hundred dollars ($100), and all anonymous contributions in excess of one
hundred dollars ($100) shall be returned to the donor, if the donor can be
determined. If no donor is found, the contribution shall escheat to the state. No
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone
acting on their behalf shall accept anonymous contributions in excess of two
thousand dollars ($2,000) in the aggregate in any one (1) election. Anonymous
contributions in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) in the aggregate which are
Page 35 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
received in any one (1) election shall escheat to the state.
(4) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor
anyone on their behalf, shall accept a cash contribution in excess of one hundred
dollars ($100) in the aggregate from each contributor in any one (1) election. No
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone
on their behalf, shall accept a cashier's check or money order in excess of the
maximum cash contribution limit unless the instrument clearly identifies both the
payor and the payee. A contribution made by cashier's check or money order which
identifies both the payor and payee shall be treated as a contribution made by check
for purposes of the contribution limits contained in this section. No person shall
make a cash contribution in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate
in any one (1) election to a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or
contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf.
(5) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, contributing organization, nor anyone
on their behalf, shall accept any contribution in excess of one hundred dollars
($100) from any person who shall not become eighteen (18) years of age on or
before the day of the next general election.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (22) of this section, no candidate, slate of
candidates, campaign committee, nor anyone acting on their behalf, shall accept a
contribution of more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for inflation
every odd-numbered year using the preceding year's percent increase in the non-
seasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers
(CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, for that year as published by the United
States Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars, from
any person, permanent committee, or contributing organization in any one (1)
election. No person, permanent committee, or contributing organization shall
contribute more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for inflation every
Page 36 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
odd-numbered year using the preceding year's percent increase in the non-
seasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers
(CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, as published by the United States Bureau of
Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars, to any one (1)
candidate, campaign committee, nor anyone acting on their behalf, in any one (1)
election.
(7) Permanent committees or contributing organizations affiliated by bylaw structure or
by registration, as determined by the Registry of Election Finance, shall be
considered as one (1) committee for purposes of applying the contribution limits of
subsection (6) of this section.
(8) No permanent committee shall contribute funds to another permanent committee for
the purpose of circumventing contribution limits of subsection (6) of this section. A
permanent committee or independent expenditure-only committee may make
unlimited contributions to an independent expenditure-only committee, or as
allowed by federal law to a federally registered political committee, provided that if
a contribution is earmarked for a particular independent expenditure, the person
making the independent expenditure shall disclose the contribution when reporting
the independent expenditure pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(9) No person shall contribute funds to a permanent committee, political issues
committee, or contributing organization for the purpose of circumventing the
contribution limits of subsection (6) of this section.
(10) No person shall contribute more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for
inflation every odd-numbered year using the preceding year's percent increase in
the non-seasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban
Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, for that year as published by the
United States Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars,
to a permanent committee or contributing organization in any one (1) year.
Page 37 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
(11) (a) No person shall contribute more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) to the
state executive committee of a political party in any one (1) year. The
contribution limit in this paragraph shall not apply to a contribution
designated exclusively for a state executive committee's building fund account
established under KRS 121.172.
(b) No person shall contribute more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) to a
subdivision or affiliate of a state political party in any one (1) year.
(c) No person shall contribute more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) to a
caucus campaign committee in any one (1) year.
(12) No person shall make a payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of
money to another person to contribute to a candidate, a slate of candidates,
committee, contributing organization, or anyone on their behalf. No candidate, slate
of candidates, committee, contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf
shall accept a contribution made by one (1) person who has received a payment,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money from another person to
contribute to a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, contributing
organization, or anyone on their behalf.
(13) Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of
candidates for nomination to any state, county, city, or district office, nor their
campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit or accept
contributions for primary election expenses after the date of the primary. No person
other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for primary election
expenses after the date of the primary.
(14) Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of
candidates for any state, county, city, or district office at a regular election, nor their
campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit or accept
contributions for regular election expenses after the date of the regular election. No
Page 38 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
person other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for regular
election expenses after the date of the regular election.
(15) Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of
candidates for nomination or election to any state, county, city, or district office,
nor their campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit or accept
contributions for special election expenses after the date of the special election. No
person other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for special
election expenses after the date of the special election.
(16) The provisions of subsections (13) and (14) of this section shall apply only to those
candidates in a primary or regular election which shall be conducted subsequent to
January 1, 1989. The provisions of subsection (15) of this section shall apply only
to those candidates or slates of candidates in a special election which shall be
conducted subsequent to January 1, 1993.
(17) A candidate, slate of candidates, or a campaign committee may solicit and accept
contributions after the date of a primary election, regular election, or special
election to defray necessary expenses that arise after the date of the election
associated with election contests, recounts, and recanvasses of a specific election,
complaints regarding alleged campaign finance violations that are filed with the
registry pertaining to a specific election, or other legal actions pertaining to a
specific election to which a candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign committee
is a party, and for repayment of debts and obligations owed by the campaign or
previous campaign for the same office. Reports of contributions received and
expenditures made after the date of the specific election shall be made in
accordance with KRS 121.180.
(18) No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, except a political issues committee,
independent expenditure-only committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone
on their behalf, shall knowingly accept a contribution from a corporation, directly
Page 39 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
or indirectly, except to the extent that the contribution is designated to a state
executive committee's building fund account established under KRS 121.172.
(19) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the ability of a corporation to
administer its permanent committee insofar as its actions can be deemed not to
influence an election as prohibited by KRS 121.025.
(20) No candidate, slate of candidates, or committee, nor anyone on their behalf, shall
solicit a contribution of money or services from a state employee, whether or not
the employee is covered by the classified service provisions of KRS Chapter 18A.
However, it shall not be a violation of this subsection for a state employee to
receive a solicitation directed to him as a registered voter in an identified precinct as
part of an overall plan to contact voters not identified as state employees.
(21) No candidate or slate of candidates for any office in this state shall accept a
contribution, including an in-kind contribution, which is made from funds in a
federal campaign account. No person shall make a contribution, including an in-
kind contribution, from funds in a federal campaign account to any candidate or
slate of candidates for any office in this state. However, it shall not be a violation
of this subsection for a federal candidate to contribute to a party executive
committee if the amount of the contribution does not exceed the contribution
limit contained in subsection (11) of this section and the contribution is not
earmarked for a particular candidate or slate of candidates.
(22) It shall be permissible for a married couple to make a contribution with one (1)
check that reflects the combined individual contribution limits of each individual
spouse per election, as set forth in subsection (6) of this section, for all elections in
a calendar year and the following shall be required to be written on the check:
(a) The signatures of both spouses on the signature line of the check; and
(b) The designation of each contribution amount and the election or elections to
which they apply shall be memorialized on the memo line of the check.
Page 40 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
(23) This section and any other provision of this chapter shall not be construed to
prohibit a qualified political party committee, including a state or county
executive committee, from endorsing, supporting, opposing, or making otherwise
lawful contributions or expenditures supporting or opposing a candidacy
designated as nonpartisan under state law. The endorsement, support, or
opposition by a political party committee shall not affect the nonpartisan status of
the office or the candidate.
Section 18. KRS 121.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All newspaper or magazine advertising, posters, circulars, billboards, handbills,
sample ballots, digital media, and paid-for television or radio announcements, or
any other type of general public political advertising, which expressly advocate the
election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate, slate of candidates, or group of
candidates for nomination or election to any public office, or expressly advocate or
oppose a ballot measure, shall be identified by the words "paid for by" followed by
the name and address of the individual or committee which paid for the
communication; except that if paid for by a candidate, slate of candidates, or
campaign committee, it shall be identified only by the words "paid for by" followed
by the name of the candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign committee,
whichever is applicable. For television and radio broadcasts, compliance with
Federal Communications Commission regulations regarding sponsored programs
and broadcasts by candidates for public office shall be considered compliance with
this section.
(2) The disclaimer described in subsection (1) of this section shall appear and be
presented in a clear and conspicuous manner to give the reader or observer adequate
notice of the identity of the purchaser of the communication. A disclaimer does not
comply with this section if the disclaimer is difficult to read or if the placement of
the disclaimer is easily overlooked.
Page 41 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
(3) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Any news articles, editorial endorsements, opinion, or commentary writings,
or letter to the editor printed in a newspaper, magazine, flyer, pamphlet, or
other periodical not owned or controlled by a candidate or committee;
(b) Any editorial endorsements or opinions aired by a broadcast facility not
owned or controlled by a candidate or committee;
(c) Any communication by a person made in the regular course and scope of the
person's business or any communication made by a membership organization
solely to members of the organization and the members' families; and
(d) Any communication that refers to any candidate only as part of the popular
name of a bill or statute.
(4) (a) A person shall not use, cause or permit to be used, or continue to use any
published, distributed, or broadcast political advertising containing express
advocacy that the person knows does not include the disclosure required by
subsection (1) of this section. A person is presumed to know that the use of
political advertising is prohibited by this subsection if the registry notifies the
person in writing that the use is prohibited.
(b) A person who learns that political advertising signs that have been distributed
do not include the disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section or
include a disclosure that does not comply with subsection (1) of this section
does not commit a violation of this subsection if the person makes a good-
faith attempt to remove or correct those signs within forty-eight (48) hours
and provides the registry with proof of correction.
(5) The management of newspapers and magazines shall keep a one (1) year record of
all statements, articles, or advertisements referred to in subsection (1) of this
section, that appear in their publications, however, nothing in subsection (1) of this
section shall be construed to require editors or editorial writers of newspapers and
Page 42 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 534/GA
magazines to identify themselves in the manner therein required with any article or
editorial written by them as part of their duties as an employee or employer.
Page 43 of 43
HB053410.100 - 1334 - XXXX 3/5/2026 3:45 PM GA